Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle F. Purging.

§ 23-15-151.
List of persons convicted of certain crimes to be kept by circuit clerk and entered into Statewide Elections Management System; removal of disenfranchised voters from system.

The circuit clerk of each county is authorized and directed to prepare and keep in his or her office a full and complete list, in alphabetical order, of persons convicted of voter fraud or of any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890. A certified copy of any enrollment by one clerk to another will be sufficient authority for the enrollment of the name, or names, in another county. A list of persons convicted of voter fraud, any crime listed in Section 241, Mississippi Constitution of 1890, or any crime interpreted as disenfranchising in later Attorney General opinions, shall also be entered into the Statewide Elections Management System on a quarterly basis. Voters who have been convicted in a Mississippi state court of any disenfranchising crime are not qualified electors as defined by Section 23-15-11 and shall be purged or otherwise removed by the county registrar or county election commissioners from the Statewide Elections Management System.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-37 [Codes, 1906, §§ 879, 4121; Hemingway’s 1917, §§ 4037, 6755; 1930, §§ 4079, 6187; 1942, §§ 3215, 7920; Laws, 1898, ch. 62; Laws, 1908, ch. 109; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 331]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 42; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 517, § 3; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 26, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-153.
Revision of county voter roll by election commissioners; removal of voters from roll; amount and limitations of per diem payments to election commissioners; distribution of master voter roll to municipal registrars; certification of hours worked; number of days in calendar year for which election commissioners entitled to receive compensation.

At least during the following times, the election commissioners shall meet at the office of the registrar or the office of the election commissioners to carefully revise the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and remove from the roll the names of all voters who have requested to be purged from the voter roll, died, received an adjudication of non compos mentis, been convicted of a disenfranchising crime, or otherwise become disqualified as electors for any cause, and shall register the names of all persons who have duly applied to be registered but have been illegally denied registration:

On the Tuesday after the second Monday in January 1987 and every following year;

On the first Tuesday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for members of Congress in the years when members of Congress are elected;

On the first Monday in the month immediately preceding the first primary election for state, state district legislative, county and county district offices in the years in which those offices are elected; and

On the second Monday of September preceding the general election or regular special election day in years in which a general election is not conducted.

Except for the names of those voters who are duly qualified to vote in the election, no name shall be permitted to remain in the Statewide Elections Management System; however, no name shall be purged from the Statewide Elections Management System based on a change in the residence of an elector except in accordance with procedures provided for by the National Voter Registration Act of 1993. Except as otherwise provided by Section 23-15-573, no person shall vote at any election whose name is not in the county voter roll electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System.

Except as provided in this section, and subject to the following annual limitations, the election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount ofOne Hundred Dollars ($100.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section:

In counties having less than fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than fifty (50) days per year, with no more than fifteen (15) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having fifteen thousand (15,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than seventy-five (75) days per year, with no more than twenty-five (25) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having thirty thousand (30,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred (100) days per year, with no more than thirty-five (35) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having seventy thousand (70,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred twenty-five (125) days per year, with no more than forty-five (45) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having ninety thousand (90,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred fifty (150) days per year, with no more than fifty-five (55) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having one hundred seventy thousand (170,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred seventy-five (175) days per year, with no more than sixty-five (65) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having two hundred thousand (200,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than one hundred ninety (190) days per year, with no more than seventy-five (75) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having two hundred twenty-five thousand (225,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred fifteen (215) days per year, with no more than eighty-five (85) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having two hundred fifty thousand (250,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census but less than two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census, not more than two hundred thirty (230) days per year, with no more than ninety-five (95) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (1) occurring in any calendar year;

In counties having two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) residents according to the latest federal decennial census or more, not more than two hundred forty (240) days per year, with no more than one hundred five (105) additional days allowed for the conduct of each election in excess of one (l) occurring in any calendar year.

In addition to the number of days authorized in subsection (2) of this section, the board of supervisors of a county may authorize, in its discretion, the election commissioners to receive a per diem in the amount provided for in subsection (2) of this section, to be paid from the county general fund, for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties in the conduct of an election or actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System as required in subsection (1) of this section, for not to exceed five (5) days.

The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed ten (10) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System before any special election. For purposes of this paragraph, the regular special election day shall not be considered a special election. The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall not apply to this paragraph.

The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Fifty Dollars ($150.00), to be paid from the county general fund, for the performance of their duties on the day of any general or special election. The annual limitations set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall apply to this paragraph.

The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive a per diem in the amount of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00), to be paid from the county general fund, not to exceed fourteen (14) days for every day or period of no less than five (5) hours accumulated over two (2) or more days actually employed in the performance of their duties for the necessary time spent in the revision of the county voter roll as electronically maintained by the Statewide Elections Management System and in the conduct of a runoff election following either a general or special election.

The election commissioners shall be entitled to receive only one (1) per diem payment for those days when the election commissioners discharge more than one (1) duty or responsibility on the same day.

In preparation for a municipal primary, runoff, general or special election, the county registrar shall generate and distribute the master voter roll and pollbooks from the Statewide Elections Management System for the municipality located within the county. The municipality shall pay the county registrar for the actual cost of preparing and printing the municipal master voter roll pollbooks. A municipality may secure “read only” access to the Statewide Elections Management System and print its own pollbooks using this information.

County election commissioners who perform the duties of an executive committee with regard to the conduct of a primary election under a written agreement authorized by law to be entered into with an executive committee shall receive per diem as provided for in subsection (2) of this section. The days that county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of a primary election shall be treated the same as days county election commissioners are employed in the conduct of other elections.

In addition to any per diem authorized by this section, any election commissioner shall be entitled to the mileage reimbursement rate allowable to federal employees for the use of a privately owned vehicle while on official travel on election day.

Every election commissioner shall sign personally a certification setting forth the number of hours actually worked in the performance of the commissioner’s official duties and for which the commissioner seeks compensation. The certification must be on a form as prescribed in this subsection. The commissioner’s signature is, as a matter of law, made under the commissioner’s oath of office and under penalties of perjury.

The certification form shall be as follows:

Click to view

Any election commissioner who has not received a certificate issued by the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 23-15-211 indicating that the election commissioner has received the required elections seminar instruction and that the election commissioner is fully qualified to conduct an election, shall not receive any compensation authorized by this section or Section 23-15-239.

COUNTY ELECTION COMMISSIONER PER DIEM CLAIM FORM NAME: COUNTY: ADDRESS: DISTRICT: CITY: ZIP: PURPOSE APPLICABLE ACTUAL PER DIEM DATE BEGINNING ENDING OF MS CODE HOURS DAYS WORKED TIME TIME WORK SECTION WORKED EARNED TOTAL NUMBER OF PER DIEM DAYS EARNED EXCLUDING ELECTION DAYS PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED x $100.00 TOTAL NUMBER PER DIEM DAYS EARNED FOR ELECTION DAYS PER DIEM RATE PER DAY EARNED x $150.00 TOTAL AMOUNT OF PER DIEM CLAIMED $ I understand that I am signing this document under my oath as an election commissioner and under penalties of perjury. I understand that I am requesting payment from taxpayer funds and that I have an obligation to be specific and truthful as to the amount of hours worked and the compensation I am requesting. Signed this the day of , , Commissioner’s Signature When properly completed and signed, the certification must be filed with the clerk of the county board of supervisors before any payment may be made. The certification will be a public record available for inspection and reproduction immediately upon the oral or written request of any person. Any person may contest the accuracy of the certification in any respect by notifying the chair of the commission, any member of the board of supervisors or the clerk of the board of supervisors of the contest at any time before or after payment is made. If the contest is made before payment is made, no payment shall be made as to the contested certificate until the contest is finally disposed of. The person filing the contest shall be entitled to a full hearing, and the clerk of the board of supervisors shall issue subpoenas upon request of the contestor compelling the attendance of witnesses and production of documents and things. The contestor shall have the right to appeal de novo to the circuit court of the involved county, which appeal must be perfected within thirty (30) days from a final decision of the commission, the clerk of the board of supervisors or the board of supervisors, as the case may be. Any contestor who successfully contests any certification will be awarded all expenses incident to his or her contest, together with reasonable attorney’s fees, which will be awarded upon petition to the chancery court of the involved county upon final disposition of the contest before the election commission, board of supervisors, clerk of the board of supervisors, or, in case of an appeal, final disposition by the court. The commissioner against whom the contest is decided shall be liable for the payment of the expenses and attorney’s fees, and the county shall be jointly and severally liable for same.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-79 [Codes, 1880, § 124; 1892, § 3635; 1906, § 4142; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6776; 1930, § 6211; 1942, § 3239; Laws, 1968, ch. 570, § 1; Laws, 1970, ch. 506, § 24; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 423, §§ 1, 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 43; Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 15; Laws, 1988, ch. 389, § 1; Laws, 1993, ch. 510, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 590, § 2; Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 4; Laws, 2001, ch. 414, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 444, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 305, § 12; Laws, 2006, ch. 592, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 434, § 4; Laws, 2010, ch. 377, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 413, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 456, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 381, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 2017; Laws, 2018, ch. 399, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§§ 23-15-155 and 23-15-157.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 499, § 19, eff from and after July 24, 1987 (the date on which the United States Attorney General interposed no objection to the repeal of this section).

§23-15-155. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-80 (Laws, 1983, ch. 423, § 3; Laws, 1986, ch. 484, § 14; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335); en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 44]

§23-15-157. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-81 (Codes, 1942, § 3240; Laws, 1938, Ex ch. 84; Laws, 1946, ch. 220; Laws, 1958, ch. 541; Laws, 1963, 1st Ex Sess ch. 33; Laws, 1966, ch. 612, § 1; Laws, 1975, ch. 497, § 1; Laws, 1979, ch. 487, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 423, §§ 2, 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335); en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 45]

§ 23-15-159.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 7, effective from and after August 11, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the repeal of this section).

[Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-82 [Laws, 1983, ch. 524, §§ 1, 2; Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; En, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 46, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-160.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 189, effective July 1, 2017.

§23-15-160. [Laws, 2000, ch. 430, § 5, eff from and after August 11, 2000 (the date the United States Attorney General interposed no objection under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965 to the enactment of this section.)]

§ 23-15-161.
Attendance and assistance of county registrar at meeting of county election commissioners.

The county registrar shall:

Attend the meetings of the county election commissioners;

Permit and furnish them access to the Statewide Elections Management System; and

Render them all needed assistance of which the registrar is capable in the performance of their duties in revising the list of qualified electors.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-5-83 [Codes, 1880, § 125; 1892, § 3636; 1906, § 4143; Hemingway’s 1917, § 6777; 1930, § 6212; 1942, § 3241; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 335]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 47; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 28, eff from and after July 1, 2017.